Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 21.1 Unclaimed Intangible and Tangible Property
33-21.1-17.
Report of abandoned property.

A person holding property tangible or intangible, presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter, shall report to the administrator concerning the property as provided in this section.

The report must be verified and must include:

Except with respect to travelers checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last-known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property of the value of fifty ($50.00) dollars or more presumed abandoned under this chapter;

In the case of unclaimed funds of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, the full name and last known address of the insured or annuitant and of the beneficiary according to the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds;

In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or of other tangible property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and may be inspected by the administrator and any amounts owing to the holder;

The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due, but items of value under fifty dollars ($50.00) each shall be reported in the aggregate;

The date the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

Other information the administrator prescribes by rule as necessary for the administration of this chapter.

If the person holding property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed his or her name while holding the property, he or she shall file with his or her report all known names and addresses of each previous holder of the property.

The report must be filed before November 1 of each year as of June 30, next preceding, and the report of any life insurance company, including the report of unclaimed insurance company demutualization proceeds made pursuant to §

33-21.1-16.1

, must be filed before November 1 of each year as of June 30 next preceding. On written request by any person required to file a report, the administrator may postpone the reporting date.

Not more than one hundred and twenty (120) days before filing the report required by this section, the holder in possession of property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall send written notice to the apparent owner at his or her last known address informing him or her that the holder is in possession of property subject to this chapter if:

The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate;

The claim of the apparent owner is not barred by the statute of limitations; and

The property has a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the administrator may provide information in the form of a social security number or taxpayer identification number to the department of taxation and department of labor and training for the sole purpose of obtaining the name and current address of rightful property owner(s) to implement §

33-21.1-24

. The information obtained and/or provided shall be kept confidential and the administrator shall be subject to the same confidentiality laws that apply to the state departments providing the information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 33, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 189, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 319, § 2.

33-21.1-18.
Notice and publication of lists of abandoned property.

The administrator shall place an advertisement, twice a year, one not later than March 1 and one not later than October 15, at least once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper or combination of newspapers of general circulation that reach each county in the state. The advertisement shall: (1) Not exceed one quarter (1/4) of a newspaper page; and (2) List a phone number citizens can call to request a written copy of the unclaimed property publication; and (3) List a website that provides the information contained in the unclaimed property publication. The unclaimed property publication shall consist of two (2) parts.

Part one of the unclaimed property publication must be entitled “Names of Persons Appearing to be Owners of Abandoned Property” and contain:

The names in alphabetical order and last known address, if any, of persons listed in the report and entitled to notice within the state;

A statement that information concerning the property and the name and last known address of the holder may be obtained by any person possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the administrator; and

A statement that if proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the holder and the owner’s right to receive the property is not established to the holder’s satisfaction the property will be placed in the custody of the administrator and all further claims must thereafter be directed to the administrator.

This section is not applicable to sums payable on travelers checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed abandoned under §

33-21.1-4

or museum property subject to chapter 44.1 of title 34.

Part two (2) of the unclaimed property publication must be entitled “Names of Persons Appearing to be Owners of Abandoned Museum Property” and contain the following information that a museum, as defined in chapter 44.1 of title 34, has provided to the administrator:

The name and address of the museum and brief and general description of the unclaimed property, including the approximate date the property came into the custody of the museum;

If known, the name and address of the lender on record with the museum;

A request that all persons who may have any knowledge of the whereabouts of the lender provide written notice to the museum;

The name, and contact information of the person at the museum to be contacted regarding the property; and

Language providing that if a written assertion of title is not presented by the lender to the museum within sixty (60) days from the last day that the notice is included in the unclaimed property publication, the property shall be considered abandoned and donated and shall become the property of the museum.

After notice has been posted in part two (2) of the unclaimed property publication for six (6) months, the administrator shall provide in writing to each museum confirmation of the dates that the properties were included in the unclaimed property publication.

The administrator shall have the authority to establish procedures to implement the provisions of this subsection (c); provided however, that at no time shall any property be placed in the custody of the administrator and provided further that the administrator shall have no authority to determine any claim of ownership. All claims shall be directed to the museum that has custody of the property and any claim of ownership shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of chapter 44.1 of title 34. The administrator, and the administrator’s employees and agents, shall not be liable for any actions taken in carrying out the requirements of this subsection (c).

The administrator is not required to publish in the unclaimed property publication any items of less than fifty dollars ($50.00) unless the administrator considers their publication to be in the public interest or a museum’s requests that an item be published in the unclaimed property publication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 33, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 2.

33-21.1-19.
Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a person who is required to file a report under §

33-21.1-17

, shall at the time of filing the report as required by §

33-21.1-17

pay or deliver to the administrator all abandoned property required to be reported.

If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the administrator, and the property will no longer be presumed abandoned. In that case, the holder shall file with the administrator a verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in the presumption of abandonment.

The holder of an interest under §

33-21.1-10

shall deliver a duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership to the administrator. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the administrator, the holder and any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with the provision of §

33-21.1-20

to every person, including any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the administrator, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the issuance and delivery to the administrator of the duplicate certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-20.
Custody by state — Defense of holder — Payment of safe deposit box or repository charges.

Upon the payment or delivery of property to the administrator, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A person who pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any claim then existing or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property.

A holder who has paid money to the administrator pursuant to this chapter may make payment to any person appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment and, upon filing proof of payment and proof that the payee was entitled to payment, the administrator shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing any fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a travelers check or money order, the holder must be reimbursed under this subsection upon filing proof that the instrument was duly presented and that payment was made to a person who appeared to the holder to be entitled to payment. The holder must be reimbursed for payment made under this subsection even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was barred under §

33-21.1-29(a)

.

A holder who has delivered property, including a certificate of any interest in a business association, other than money to the administrator pursuant to this chapter may reclaim the property if still in the possession of the administrator, without paying any fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the owner has claimed the property from the holder.

The administrator may accept the holder’s affidavit as sufficient proof of the facts that entitle the holder to recover money and property under this section.

If the holder pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith and later another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat, abandoned, or unclaimed property, the administrator, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any liability on the claim.

For the purposes of this section, “good faith” means that:

Payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with this chapter;

The person delivering the property was not a fiduciary then in breach of trust in respect to the property and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known to him or her, that the property was abandoned for the purposes of this chapter; and

There is no showing that the records pursuant to which the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice in the industry.

Property removed from a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository is received by the administrator subject to the holder’s right under this subsection to be reimbursed for the actual cost of the opening and to any valid lien or contract providing for the holder to be reimbursed for unpaid rent or storage charges. The administrator shall reimburse or pay the holder out of the proceeds remaining after deducting the administrator’s selling cost.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-21.
Crediting of dividends, interest or increments to owner’s account.

Whenever property, other than money, is paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter, the owner is entitled to receive from the administrator any dividends, interest, or other increments, realized or accruing on the property at or before liquidation or conversion of the property into money.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-22.
Public sale of abandoned property.

The administrator shall sell abandoned property to the highest bidder at public sale in whatever city in the state affords in the judgment of the administrator the most favorable market for the property involved. The administrator may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if in the judgment of the administrator the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment of the administrator the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property, it need not be offered for sale. Any sale held under this section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three (3) weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold.

[As amended by P.L. 2009, ch. 232, § 1]. If medals awarded to United States military personnel are delivered to the general treasurer under this chapter, the general treasurer shall not offer those medals for public sale or at public auction. Medals shall only be returned to the owner of the safe deposit box containing the medals, or the heirs of that owner.

(1)

[As amended by
P.L. 2009, ch. 305, § 1]. If medals awarded to United States military personnel are delivered to the general treasurer pursuant to this section, the general treasurer shall not offer those medals for public sale or at public auction. Medals shall be returned only to the owner of the safe deposit box containing the medals, or the heirs of the recipient of the medal.

Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the administrator considers advisable.

Unless the administrator considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, all securities, other than those presumed abandoned under §

33-21.1-10

, delivered to the administrator must be held for at least one year before he or she may sell them.

Unless the administrator considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, all securities presumed abandoned under §

33-21.1-10

, and delivered to the administrator must be held for at least one year before he or she may sell them. If the administrator sells any securities delivered pursuant to §

33-21.1-10

before the expiration of the one year period, any person making a claim pursuant to this chapter before the end of the one year period is entitled to either the proceeds of the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the time the claim is made, whichever amount is greater, less any deduction for fees pursuant to §

33-21.1-23(b)

. A person making a claim under this chapter after the expiration of this period is entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the administrator by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of the administrator, or the proceeds received from sale, less any amounts deducted pursuant to §

33-21.1-23(b)

, but no person has any claim under this chapter against the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the administrator.

The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the administrator pursuant to this chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder of the property and of all persons claiming through or under them. The administrator shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 305, § 1.

33-21.1-23.
Deposit of funds.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, the administrator shall promptly deposit in the general fund of this state all funds received under this chapter, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under §

33-21.1-22

. The administrator shall retain in a separate bank account an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from which prompt payment of claims duly allowed must be made by him or her. Before making the deposit, the administrator shall record the name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ reports to be entitled to the property and the name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant and beneficiary and with respect to each policy or contract listed in the report of an insurance company its number and the name of the company. The record with the exception of the amount due must be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

Before making any transfer from the account surplus to the credit of the general fund, the administrator may deduct:

Any costs in connection with the sale of abandoned property;

Costs of mailing and publication in connection with any abandoned property;

Reasonable service charges;

Costs incurred in examining records of holders of property and in collecting the property from those holders; and

Any other charges, costs or expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 427, § 4.

33-21.1-24.
Filing of claim with administrator.

A person, excluding another state, claiming an interest in any property paid or delivered to the administrator may file with him or her a claim on a form prescribed by him or her and verified by the claimant.

The administrator shall consider each claim within ninety (90) days after it is filed and give written notice to the claimant if the claim is denied in whole or in part. The notice may be given by mailing it to the last address, if any, stated in the claim as the address to which notices are to be sent. If no address for notices is stated in the claim, the notice may be mailed to the last address, if any, of the claimant as stated in the claim. No notice of denial need be given if the claim fails to state either the last address to which notices are to be sent or the address of the claimant.

If a claim is allowed, the administrator shall pay over or deliver to the claimant the property or the amount the administrator actually received, or the net proceeds if it has been sold by the administrator, together with any additional amount required by §

33-21.1-21

. If the claim is for property presumed abandoned under §

33-21.1-10

which was sold by the administrator within three (3) years after the date of delivery, the amount payable for that claim is the value of the property at the time the claim was made or the net proceeds of sale, whichever is greater. If the property claimed was interest bearing to the owner on the date of surrender by the holder, the administrator also shall pay interest at a rate of five percent (5%) a year or any lesser rate the property earned while in the possession of the holder. Interest begins to accrue when the property is delivered to the administrator and ceases on the earlier of the expiration of fifteen (15) years after delivery or the date on which payment is made to the owner. No interest on interest bearing property is payable for any period before the effective date of this chapter.

Any holder who pays the owner for property that has been delivered to the state and which, if claimed from the administrator, would be subject to subsection (c) shall add interest as provided in subsection (c). The added interest must be repaid to the holder by the administrator in the same manner as the principal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-25.
Claim of another state to recover property; procedure.

At any time after property has been paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter, another state may recover the property if:

The property was subjected to custody by this state because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner when the property was presumed abandoned under this chapter, and the other state establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in that state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The property was subjected to custody by this state under §

33-21.1-3(6)

and under the laws of the state of domicile of the holder the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; or

The property is the sum payable on a travelers check, money order, or other similar instrument that was subjected to custody by this state under §

33-21.1-4

, and the instrument was purchased in the other state, and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of abandonment by that state.

The claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, who shall decide the claim within ninety (90) days after it is presented. The administrator shall allow the claim if he or she determines that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (a).

The administrator shall require a state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim for the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-26.
Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a decision of the administrator, or whose claim has not been acted upon within ninety (90) days after its filing, may bring an action to establish the claim in the superior court, naming the administrator as a defendant. The action must be brought within ninety (90) days after the decision of the administrator or within one hundred and eighty (180) days after the filing of the claim if he or she has failed to act on it. The action shall be tried de novo without a jury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-27.
Election to take payment or delivery.

The administrator may decline to receive any property reported under this chapter which he or she considers to have a value less than the expense of giving notice and of sale. If the administrator elects not to receive custody of the property, the holder shall be notified within one hundred and twenty (120) days after filing the report required under §

33-21.1-17

.

A holder, with the written consent of the administrator and upon conditions and terms prescribed by him or her, may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned. Property delivered under this subsection must be held by the administrator and is not presumed abandoned until such time as it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-28.
Destruction or disposition of property having insubstantial commercial value — Immunity from liability.

If the administrator determines after investigation that any property delivered under this chapter has insubstantial commercial value, the administrator may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time. No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state, or any officer, or against the holder for on account of any action taken by the administrator pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-28.1.
Disposition of “de minimis” property.

The administrator may dispose of any “de minimis” property delivered under this chapter that has been in possession of the administrator for more than ten (10) years. No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state, or any officer, or against the holder for any action taken by the administrator pursuant to this section.

For the purposes of this chapter, “de minimis” property means any property with a value of less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 301, § 1.

33-21.1-29.
Limitation periods.

The expiration, before or after July 1, 1987, of any period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, during which a claim for money or property can be made or during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or deliver abandoned property to the administrator as required by this chapter.

No action or proceeding may be commenced by the administrator with respect to any duty of a holder under this chapter more than ten (10) years after the duty arose; however, this limitation shall not apply to any action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of the administrator against any federal, state, or local government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or entity for the payment or delivery of any abandoned property to the administrator pursuant to this chapter or to enforce or collect any penalty provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch, 233, § 1.

33-21.1-30.
Requests for reports and examination of records.

The administrator may require any person who has not filed a report to file a verified report stating whether or not the person is holding any unclaimed property reportable or deliverable under this chapter.

The administrator, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with the provisions of this chapter. The administrator may conduct the examination even if the person believes he or she is not in possession of any property reportable or deliverable under this chapter.

If a person is treated under §

33-21.1-12

as the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, the administrator, pursuant to subsection (b), may examine the records of the person if the administrator has given the notice required by subsection (b) to both the person and the business association at least ninety (90) days before the examination.

If an examination of the records of a person results in the disclosure of property reportable and deliverable under this chapter, the administrator may assess the cost of the examination against the holder at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) a day for each examiner, but in no case may the charges exceed the value of the property found to be reportable and deliverable. The cost of examination made pursuant to subsection (c) may be imposed only against the business association.

If a holder fails after July 1, 1987 to maintain the records required by §

33-21.1-31

and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this chapter are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the administrator may require the holder to report and pay any amounts as may reasonably be estimated from any available records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-31.
Retention of records.

Every holder required to file a report under §

33-21.1-17

, as to any property for which it has obtained the last known address of the owner, shall maintain a record of the name and last known address of the owner for seven (7) years after the property becomes reportable, except to the extent that a shorter time is provided in subsection (b) or by rule of the administrator.

Any business association that sells in this state its travelers checks, money orders, or other similar written instruments, other than third party bank checks on which the business association is directly liable, or that provides these instruments to others for sale in this state, shall maintain a record of those instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue for three (3) years after the date the property is reportable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-32.
Enforcement.

The administrator may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-33.
Interstate agreements and cooperation — Joint and reciprocal actions with other states.

The administrator may enter into agreements with other states to exchange information needed to enable this or another state to audit or otherwise determine unclaimed property that it or another state may be entitled to subject to a claim of custody. The administrator by rule may require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with agreements made pursuant to this section and prescribe the form.

To avoid conflicts between the administrator’s procedures and the procedures of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, the administrator, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter, before adopting, amending or repealing rules, shall advise and consult with administrators in other jurisdictions that enact substantially the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act and take into considerations the rules of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

The administrator may join with other states to seek enforcement of this chapter against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under this chapter.

At the request of another state, the attorney general of this state may bring an action in the name of the administrator of the other state in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the attorney general in bringing the action.

The administrator may request that the attorney general of another state, or any other person, bring an action in the name of the administrator in the other state. This state shall pay all expenses including attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection. The administrator may agree to pay the person bringing the action attorney’s fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any property recovered in the action. Any expenses paid pursuant to this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-34.
Interest and penalties.

A person who fails to pay or deliver property within the time prescribed by this chapter may be required to pay to the administrator interest at the annual rate of twelve percent (12%) above the annual rate of discount, in effect on the date the property should have been paid or delivered, for the most recent issue of fifty-two (52) week United States Treasury bills on the property or value thereof from the date the property should have been paid or delivered.

A person who willfully fails to render any report or perform other duties required under this chapter shall pay a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the report is withheld or the duty is not performed, but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

A person who willfully fails to pay or deliver property to the administrator as required under this chapter, shall pay a civil penalty equal to twenty five percent (25%) of the value of the property that should have been paid or delivered.

A person who willfully refuses after written demand by the administrator to pay or deliver property to the administrator as required under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The holder in possession of property who fails to comply with the notice provisions required under subsection

33-21.1-17(e)

shall pay a civil penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each account for which the statutory notice as required by subsection

33-21.1-17(e)

is not given.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-35.
Agreement to locate reported property.

All agreements to pay compensation to recover or assist in the recovery of property reported under §

33-21.1-17

, made within twenty four (24) months after the date payment or delivery is made under §

33-21.1-19

, are unenforceable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-36.
Foreign transactions.

This chapter does not apply to any property held due and owing in a foreign country and arising out of a foreign transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-37.
Effect of new provisions — Clarification of application.

This chapter does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 1, 1987 to report, pay, or deliver property. A holder who did not comply with the law in effect before July 1, 1987 is subject to the applicable enforcement and penalty provisions that then existed and these provisions are continued in effect for the purpose of this subsection, subject to §

33-21.1-29(b)

.

The initial report filed under this chapter for property that was not required to be reported before July 1, 1987 but which is subject to this chapter, must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the ten (10) year period preceding July 1, 1987, as if this chapter had been in effect during that period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-38.
Rules.

The administrator may adopt necessary rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-39.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-40.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-41.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.